Indiana, session 2026, HB1109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-17-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Hoosier Homeless Veteran Initiative
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Department" refers to the Indiana department of
veterans' affairs established by IC 10-17-1-2.
(2) "Homeless shelter" means a publicly or privately operated
facility that is designated to provide temporary living
arrangements, including:
(A) congregate shelters;
(B) transitional housing; or
(C) hotels or motels paid for by charitable organizations or
government programs.
(3) "Homeless veteran" refers to a veteran who has served at
least six (6) months in the armed forces of the United States
(as defined in IC 5-9-4-3) or national guard (as defined in
2026 IN 1109—LS 6488/DI 116


IC 5-9-4-4) and is homeless.
(4) "Initiative" refers to the Hoosier homeless veteran
initiative established by section 2 of this chapter.
(5) "Participating shelter" means a public or privately
operated facility that is approved under section 4 of this
chapter to provide a homeless veteran separate temporary
living quarters in:
(A) a house;
(B) an apartment; or
(C) a group of rooms or a single room.
(6) "Participating veteran" means a veteran who is not
married who agrees to be placed in a participating shelter
under section 5 of this chapter.
(7) "Veteran" means any individual who has served in the
armed forces of the United States (as defined in IC 5-9-4-3) or
national guard (as defined in IC 5-9-4-4) regardless of
separation status.
Sec. 2. The Hoosier homeless veteran initiative is established for
the purpose of providing a means for homeless veterans to have
access to temporary shelter during the veteran's rehabilitation.
The initiative shall be coordinated and administered by the
department in consultation with the Indiana department of health.
Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a homeless shelter that
provides temporary living arrangements to at least twenty-five (25)
individuals.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a homeless shelter shall
reserve at least one (1) bed for a homeless veteran for every
twenty-five (25) beds provided to homeless individuals.
(c) The provisions of this section do not supersede applicable
fire codes or public health and safety laws.
Sec. 4. (a) A homeless shelter or another entity may apply to
become a participating shelter in the initiative in a manner
prescribed by the department. Except as provided in section 5 of
this chapter, a participating shelter must provide food and housing
and other services prescribed by the department for the
participating veteran for a period consisting of the lesser of:
(1) two (2) years; or
(2) the period necessary for the participating veteran to
complete the requirements necessary to receive housing
vouchers in accordance with the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development's (HUD) HUD-VASH
program authorized by P.L.110-161, 121 Stat. 1844.
2026 IN 1109—LS 6488/DI 116


(b) A participating shelter is eligible for grants under
IC 10-17-13.5-4, in an amount determined by the department.
Sec. 5. (a) A homeless veteran who is not married may request
to become a participating veteran in a manner prescribed by the
department. The department may approve the homeless veteran's
request in a manner prescribed by the department. A participating
veteran is eligible for placement in a participating shelter.
(b) The homeless veteran shall not be required to test negative
on a drug or alcohol test to obtain initial placement under this
section.
(c) To maintain placement under this section, the participating
veteran must:
(1) maintain contact with a county service officer or counselor
approved by the department in a manner prescribed by the
department;
(2) present a copy of the veteran's DD 214 (as defined in
IC 10-17-15-1) within sixty (60) days after the participating
veteran's initial placement under this section;
(3) be employed or volunteer for at least ten (10) hours per
week;
(4) meet eligibility requirements to receive Medicaid under
IC 12-15 within six (6) weeks after the participating veteran's
initial placement under this section;
(5) participate in applicable rehabilitative services including:
(A) mental health counseling;
(B) addiction counseling; or
(C) job training or education programs offered by the
United States Department of Veterans' Affairs, the
department, or other programs approved by the
department;
(6) enroll in the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development's (HUD) HUD-VASH program
authorized by P.L.110-161, 121 Stat. 1844, to receive housing
vouchers;
(7) submit to regular drug and alcohol testing, in a manner
prescribed by the department; and
(8) submit signed monthly statements, on a form prescribed
by the department, to the participating shelter indicating the
veteran is in compliance with subdivisions (1) through (7).
(d) A participating veteran who does not comply with the
requirements provided in this section may result in the
participating veteran being determined to be ineligible to
2026 IN 1109—LS 6488/DI 116


participate in the initiative. A veteran who is determined to be
ineligible under this subsection is ineligible to reapply to
participate in the initiative for a period of one (1) year from the
date the veteran is determined to be ineligible under this
subsection.
Sec. 6. (a) Beginning October 1, 2026, and each quarter
thereafter, a participating shelter shall provide a report to the
department, containing information relating to the progress of
participating veterans in a manner prescribed by the department.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, and each quarter thereafter, the
department shall provide a report to the Indiana department of
health summarizing the reports received from participating
shelters.
2026 IN 1109—LS 6488/DI 116